Massachusetts, session 194th, H523.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
An Act to achieve universal pre-kindergarten
Section 13 of chapter 15D of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022 Official Edition,
is hereby amended by adding the following subsections: -
(e) The Universal Pre-Kindergarten Commission.
(1) Establishment of the Commission. There shall be a special commission for the
purpose of making an investigation and study relative to how to expand universal pre-
kindergarten to provide pre-kindergarten to every pre-kindergarten aged child in the
Commonwealth, which shall be known as the Universal Pre-Kindergarten Commission (in this
subsection referred to as the ‘commission’).
of 4

(2) Members. The commission shall be chaired by the commissioner of the department of
early education and care or the commissioner’s designee. The secretary of education or the
secretary’s designee and the commissioner of the department of elementary and secondary
education or the commissioner’s designee shall be members. The governor shall appoint 6
members, one of whom shall be nominated by Head Start Massachusetts, one of whom shall
have experience operating a private preschool, one of whom shall be a member of a teachers’
union or association, one of whom shall be nominated by the Massachusetts Association of
School Superintendents, Inc. and one of whom shall be nominated by the Massachusetts
Association of School Committees. The speaker of the house and the senate president shall each
appoint one member.
(3) Report Recommending Legislation.
(i) Deadline. The commission shall report its findings and any legislation necessary to
implement said findings to the governor, the clerks of the senate and house of representatives,
the senate and house of representatives committees on ways and means, the joint committee on
children, families, and persons with disabilities and the joint committee on education by
December 31, 2026.
(ii) Contents of the Report. The commission report shall include an analysis of how to
best expand quality pre-kindergarten offerings in Massachusetts such that every 3- and 4-year-
old child would be able to attend; how to pay for expanding pre-kindergarten offerings; the
appropriate ratio and combination of various types of pre-kindergarten programs to best serve
children throughout the state; and the best way to promote high quality educational curriculum,
of 4

child development and safety standards. In making its recommendations the commission shall
consider among other issues:
(A) the advantages and disadvantages including cost, parental preference and ease of
expansion of pre-kindergarten as provided by Head Start, public schools, programs licensed or
subsidized by the department of early education and care and private programs.
(B) the cost of expanding pre-kindergarten offerings according to the different program
models that are available, for example Head Start, public schools, programs licensed or
subsidized by the department of early education and care and private programs.
(C) the financial benefits of universal pre-kindergarten for education readiness and
greater employment opportunities for parents.
(D) the possibility of including pre-kindergarten students when calculating the
distribution of chapter 70 education funds.
(E) how to appropriately increase pre-kindergarten offerings over time while ensuring
quality of care and safety; and
(F) the optimum way to expand participation in the Quality Rating Information System
(or ‘QRIS’) or other curriculum standards programs adopted by Massachusetts, including
providing grants or other financial incentives for participation.
(f) Universal Pre-Kindergarten Expansion Funding. Notwithstanding subsection (c) of
section 10 of chapter 152 of the acts of 1997 or any other general or special law to the contrary,
no later than June 30 of each year, that portion of the balance in the Convention Center Fund
which the state treasurer has determined to exceed the amount necessary to satisfy the
of 4

requirement of sufficiency under said subsection (c) of said section 10 of said chapter 152, shall
be transferred to the department of early education and care to be used solely for the purpose of
expanding pre-kindergarten offerings.
of 4